Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1023.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 32, chapter 16, article 3, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 32-1754, to read: START_STATUTE32-1754. Eye examinations; interval; eyeglass prescriptions; period of validity A. An optometrist shall conduct an eye examination according to the standards of care prevalent in the community, including an examination of the patient's eye health and vision, with a recommended examination interval of one year. B. An optometrist may extend the period of validity of an eyeglass prescription to up to two years or may reduce the period of validity of an eyeglass prescription based on the presence or absence of any risk category of the patient and any medical or other factor attributable to the patient. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR MARCH 27, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE MARCH 27, 2026.